Massachusetts, session 194th, S437.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “attendance”, in line 120, the
following words:- ; provided, however, that all children under the age of 18 shall be required to
attend school if they have not graduated from high school.
SECTION 2. Chapter 741 of the acts of 1965 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. (a) Subject to appropriation, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop and administer a 3-year pilot program for dropout prevention and
recovery programs for school districts with annual dropout rates greater than the state average.
The pilot program shall be a competitive grant process for school districts or local community
agencies serving students who reside in the districts.
of 4

(b) The dropout prevention and recovery programs shall target high school students who
have dropped out of school or are at risk of dropping out of school using at least 1 of the methods
described in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.
(i) Alternative education, which shall mean diploma or general educational development
granting programs that use evidence-based instruction and student support strategies designed to
meet the needs of the target population and prepare them for postsecondary education or training.
The evidence-based instruction and student support strategies may include, but shall not be
limited to: smaller class size, competency-based learning, project-based learning, work-based
learning, community service learning, graduation coaching, case management, family
engagement, wraparound support, restorative justice and social service referrals;
(ii) Graduation coaches, who shall be professionals with youth development and
academic support expertise and shall provide graduation plans to the target population. The
graduation plans shall include, at a minimum, academic, career and postsecondary goals.
Graduation coaches shall also provide follow-up support to complete the graduation plans,
navigate academic requirements, engage families, overcome socio-emotional barriers and secure
appropriate social services.
(iii) Dropout outreach and recovery programs, which shall mean targeted outreach and
transition support for students who have dropped out of school. The programs shall, at a
minimum: (1) reach out to students; (1) determine their academic status and personal
circumstances; (3) assist students in enrolling in a high school or general educational
development program; and (4) provide transitional support and track student academic progress.
of 4

(iv) Expectant and parenting student support, which may include, but shall not be limited
to: (1) the development and implementation of school policies that set high academic
expectations, establish procedures for maternity and paternity leave, and provide flexible
scheduling; (2) expectant and parenting student liaisons who shall work with students to develop
graduation plans that include, at a minimum, academic, career and postsecondary goals and who
provide follow-up support to complete the graduation plans, navigate academic requirements,
engage families, overcome socio-emotional barriers and secure appropriate social services; and
(3) annual data collection that shall include, but shall not limited to, the number of parenting
students in the district, any supports or interventions provided to the parenting students, and
parenting student progress toward and completion of secondary school.
(c) The department shall develop guidelines for an annual review of the progress being
made by each district and local community agency participating in the pilot program. Each
district and agency in the pilot program shall participate in any evaluation or accountability
process implemented by or authorized by the department. The department shall prepare and
submit an annual report describing and analyzing the implementation of the pilot program in all
participating districts. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) the number of
participating school districts, schools and local community agencies; (ii) the number of students
served and the type and duration of those services; (iii) the progress made by those students
toward attaining a high school diploma or general educational development; and (iv) the number
of students served who have attained a high school diploma or passed the general educational
development test. The department shall file its annual report not later than September 1 of each
year by filing the same with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate who shall
forward a copy of the report to the joint committee on education. The department shall file a final
of 4

report within 6 months of the conclusion of the 3-year pilot period that shall include an analysis
of all relevant data so as to determine the effectiveness of the program and specific legislative
recommendations, including whether the program should be expanded, maintained or
discontinued, by filing the same with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate
who shall forward a copy of the report to the joint committee on education.
SECTION 4. Section 1 shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
of 4